Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Administration and Enforcement

§ 77-7-331.
Duties of enforcement officers.

The chief enforcement officer and the inspectors, employed pursuant to the authority granted in Section 77-1-21, shall be responsible for enforcing and investigating all alleged violations of this chapter, and the rules, regulations and general orders of the commission promulgated thereunder. In the performance of their duties such employees shall give particular attention to the enforcement of the commission’s safety rules and regulations; the provisions of this chapter applicable to rates, charges and practices of motor carriers; the provisions prohibiting unlawful preference, concession, rebate, or discrimination; the adequacy of service, equipment and facilities of motor carriers; and the requirements respecting certificate of public convenience and necessity or permits as set forth in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7692-03; Laws, 1958, ch. 505, § 4, eff July 1, 1958.

§ 77-7-333.
Training of enforcement officer; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

After selection, the chief enforcement officer and the inspectors shall go through thirty (30) days of intensive instruction of the laws of this state pertaining to the Mississippi Department of Transportation and the Department of Public Safety, together with rules and regulations of all these departments, and the laws of this state pertaining to arrest. The expenses of attending such school shall be paid out of the commission’s regulation fund on presentation of paid bills for travel and subsistence to the secretary of the commission.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7692-02; Laws, 1958, ch. 505, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 9; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 19; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-335.
Authority of enforcement officers.

All inspectors on duty shall wear uniforms, shall have the right to bear arms, and shall have the authority to make arrests and hold and impound any vehicle and the contents thereof which is being operated in violation of this chapter or the commission’s rules, regulations or general orders promulgated thereunder.

All inspectors shall have the authority to enforce all of the laws, rules and regulations of the commission upon all highways in the state and the rights-of-way of such highways and other properties as defined in Section 77-7-261; except that if any person commits an offense in violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations of this commission upon a highway in the state and be pursued by a member or inspector of the commission, such member may pursue and apprehend such offender upon any of the highways in this state, or to any other place to which such offender may flee.

All inspectors shall have the authority to aid and assist any law enforcement officer whose life or safety is in jeopardy and may arrest without warrant any fugitive from justice who has escaped or who is using the highways in the state in an attempt to flee. With the approval of the commission or its designee, inspectors of the commission may assist other law enforcement agencies in searching for convicted felons who have escaped or for alleged felons where there is probable cause to believe that the person being sought committed the felony and a felony had actually been committed.

Upon request of the Mississippi Highway Patrol, a sheriff of any county or the chief of police of any community and with the consent of the commission, all inspectors have the authority to assist in traffic control during time of natural disasters, such as hurricanes, tornados or floods.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as granting the commission general police powers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7692-04; Laws, 1958, ch. 505, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 20, eff from and after October 1, 1993; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-337.
Purchase of necessary equipment authorized; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

The commission is hereby authorized and empowered to purchase all necessary equipment to enforce the provisions of this chapter, and to pay for the same out of the commission’s regulation fund.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7692-08; Laws, 1958, ch. 505, § 9; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 10; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-339.
Payment of salaries and expenses shall be from the motor carrier regulation account; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

The salary of the chief enforcement officer and the inspectors, and the reasonable and necessary expenses of such employees and the administration of the duties imposed on the commission by this chapter, shall be paid out of the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the commission’s regulation fund, upon requisition and warrants in the same manner provided by law for the disbursements of appropriations for the commission. An itemized account shall be kept of all receipts and expenditures and shall be reported to the Legislature by the commission.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7692-09; Laws, 1958, ch. 505, § 10; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 11; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-341.
Cooperation with other agencies authorized.

For the purpose of administering and enforcing the provisions of this chapter, the commission shall have the power, and is directed to cooperate with and use the services of the members of the highway safety patrol and the inspectors employed by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, and the commission shall utilize the facilities and equipment of the inspection stations maintained by the Mississippi Department of Transportation. However, in utilizing these personnel and facilities, the commission shall not interfere with or impede the performance by the personnel of the duties and responsibilities otherwise assigned to them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7692-05; Laws, 1958, ch. 505, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 21, eff from and after October 1, 1993.